Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-605.04
Death; autopsy; sudden infant death syndrome; report by county attorney or coroner; to whom.

The county attorney or coroner shall, within two days of the issuance of the autopsy results showing death suspected due to the sudden infant death syndrome, notify a representative of the Nebraska Sudden Infant Death Syndrome Foundation or the appropriate area community mental health center of the name of the parents of the sudden infant death syndrome victim.

Laws 1978, LB 605, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 954, § 1.